Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 25
JURISDICTION OF THE COURTS

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 5 of chapter 92, C.R.S. 1963. The provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1988, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1988, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. sections are shown in editors' notes following those sections that were relocated.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 34-20-102.

Section

34-25-101. Jurisdiction of the courts.

County courts in their respective counties have original jurisdiction in prosecution for the violation of section 34-24-103 (1). In all trials in the county courts, the defendants shall be entitled to a trial by jury as in other misdemeanor cases. District courts in their respective districts have original jurisdiction upon information or indictment in all prosecutions for violations of this title.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1198, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2983, § 75, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 34-40-119 and 34-47-130 as they existed prior to 1988.